Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-415
Narcotic drugs;
label; requirements.

(1) A manufacturer, distributor,
or packager who sells or dispenses a narcotic drug or a wholesaler who sells
or dispenses a narcotic drug in a package prepared by him or her shall securely
affix a label to each package in which such drug is contained showing in legible
English the name and address of the vendor and the quantity, kind, and form
of narcotic drug contained therein. No person, except a pharmacy for the purpose
of filling a medical order under the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, shall
alter, deface, or remove any label so affixed.

(2) A pharmacy that sells or dispenses any narcotic drug
on a prescription issued by a practitioner shall affix a label to the container
in which such drug is sold or dispensed pursuant to subsection (3) of section 28-414.03. No
person shall alter, deface, or remove any label so affixed.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 75;

Laws 1988, LB 273, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 379, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 13;

Laws 2014, LB811, § 14.